District of Columbia statutes.
21-2203

Presumption of capacity.

An individual shall be presumed capable of making health-care decisions unless certified otherwise under § 21-2204. Mental incapacity to make a health-care decision shall not be inferred from the fact that an individual:

(1)

Has been voluntarily or involuntarily hospitalized for mental illness pursuant to § 21-501 et seq.;

(2)

Has a diagnosis of an intellectual disability or has been determined by a court to be incompetent to refuse commitment under § 7-1301.01 et seq.; or

(3)

Has a conservator or guardian appointed pursuant to § 21-1501 et seq. [repealed] or § 21-2001 et seq.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-189, § 4, 35 DCR 8653
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 23(d), 40 DCR 6311
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 35(d), 53 DCR 6198
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 21(i), 59 DCR 5567
1981 Ed., § 21-2203.
D.C. Law 16-305, in par. (2), substituted “Has a diagnosis of mental retardation” for “Is mentally retarded”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “an intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” in (2).
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.